Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-201.04
Supreme Court judicial districts; population figures and maps; basis.

For purposes of section 24-201.02, the Legislature adopts the official population figures and maps from the 2020 Census Redistricting (Public Law 94-171) TIGER/Line Shapefiles published by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census.

Laws 1991, LB 616, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 853, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB699, § 2;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB6, § 2.